Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF819.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2670YH (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 819 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 53.5 Absentee ballot marking pilot 1 program. 2 1. The state commissioner may adopt rules pursuant 3 to chapter 17A to implement a pilot program to establish 4 procedures to enable a voter with a disability that prevents 5 the voter from marking a ballot by hand to independently and 6 privately mark a ballot or use an electronic voting device that 7 produces a paper record using nonvisual access, low-vision 8 access, or other assistive technology in order for the voter to 9 complete an absentee ballot by mail pursuant to this chapter. 10 The procedures must include a method by which a voter with a 11 disability that prevents the voter from marking a ballot by 12 hand to request an absentee ballot by mail. 13 2. If the pilot program under this section is not 14 implemented statewide, the pilot program must include a 15 sufficient number of counties, as determined by the state 16 commissioner, to conclude whether the program is feasible 17 statewide. 18 3. The state commissioner shall file a report with the 19 general assembly by December 31 of each year regarding the 20 pilot program established under this section. 21 4. This section is repealed July 1, 2028. 22